Hawaii statutes.
[§658A-6] Validity of agreement to
arbitrate. (a) An agreement contained in a record to submit to
arbitration any existing or subsequent controversy arising between the parties
to the agreement is valid, enforceable, and irrevocable except upon a ground
that exists at law or in equity for the revocation of a contract.

(b) The court shall decide whether an
agreement to arbitrate exists or a controversy is subject to an agreement to
arbitrate.

(c) An arbitrator shall decide whether a
condition precedent to arbitrability has been fulfilled and whether a contract
containing a valid agreement to arbitrate is enforceable.

(d) If a party to a judicial proceeding
challenges the existence of, or claims that a controversy is not subject to, an
agreement to arbitrate, the arbitration proceeding may continue pending final
resolution of the issue by the court, unless the court otherwise orders. [L
2001, c 265, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Circuit court erred in determining that petitioner's claim
that the arbitration provision in question was unconscionable on several
grounds were beyond the scope of its review in deciding on a motion to compel
arbitration; unconscionability is a generally applicable contract defense and
is within the scope of the circuit court's review on the question of whether a
valid and enforceable agreement to arbitrate exists. 130 H. 437, 312 P.3d 869
(2013).

The circuit court should have granted the petitioner's motion
to compel arbitration because there was an arbitration agreement between the
parties that clearly and unmistakably left the issue of arbitrability to the
arbitrator. 132 H. 426, 322 P.3d 966 (2014).

Cited: 297 F. Supp. 2d 1259 (2003).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next